Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
Airport Loans

183.200.
Declaration of purpose.

Recognizing that the rapid development of a statewide system of airports is of prime importance in the industrial development of the state, the General Assembly reaffirms its previous declarations that the acquisition, establishment, construction, enlargement, improvement, maintenance, equipping and operation of airports is a public purpose, and further declares assistance in the financing of local airport projects to be within the proper province of state government.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 122, § 1.

183.203.
Applications for assistance — Airport loan committee, functions. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 122, § 2; repealed by 2022 ch. 218, § 6, effective July 14, 2022.

183.205.
Board may issue revenue bonds. [Repealed.]

183.207.
Eligibility for loan. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 122, § 3; repealed by 2022 ch. 218, § 6, effective July 14, 2022.

183.210.
Loan terms — Security. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 122, § 4; repealed by 2022 ch. 218, § 6, effective July 14, 2022.

183.213.
Regulations. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 122, § 5; repealed by 2022 ch. 218, § 6, effective July 14, 2022.

183.215.
Alternative method for acquiring and developing airports and issuing revenue bonds. [Repealed.]

183.220.
Certain counties may appropriate money for airports; when. [Repealed.]

183.230.
Park boards in first-class cities may establish airports. [Repealed.]

183.240.
Money that may be expended for airport. [Repealed.]

183.250.
Board may make rules and regulations for use of airports. [Repealed.]

183.260.
Board may make contracts for use of airport; limitations. [Repealed.]

183.270.
Disposition of revenues of airport. [Repealed.]

183.280.
Sale of gasoline to persons using airport. [Repealed.]

183.290.
Airports to be considered park property. [Repealed.]

183.300.
Cities of second, third, fourth or fifth class and counties containing such cities may establish airports. [Repealed.]

183.310.
Money that may be expended; airports may be leased or assigned. [Repealed.]

183.320.
Rules and regulations for use of airports; city and county authority includes airports. [Repealed.]

183.330.
Contracts for use of airports; limitations. [Repealed.]

183.340.
Disposition of revenues of airports. [Repealed.]

183.350.
Sale of gasoline and oil. [Repealed.]

183.360.
Governing authorities of cities and counties to manage airports. [Repealed.]

183.370.
Airports in counties and cities of second to sixth classes — Condemnation. [Repealed.]

183.380.
Lease of airport; management with or without airport board. [Repealed.]

183.390.
Airport boards — Authority — Terms of members. [Repealed.]

183.400.
Nature and powers of airport boards — Compensation and employes. [Repealed.]

183.410.
Officers of board. [Repealed.]

183.420.
Duties of secretary-treasurer. [Repealed.]

183.430.
Regulations and fees — Policing. [Repealed.]

183.440.
Contracts for use of airport. [Repealed.]

183.450.
Expenditures for airport. [Repealed.]

183.460.
Storage and sale of gasoline and oil. [Repealed.]

183.470.
Title to airport property — Property and income exempt from taxation. [Repealed.]